California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Prepares as a fiduciary a claim for assistance for any person.

(c) This section does not apply where the tax preparer has advanced the taxpayer an amount of money equal to or greater than the
 amount of the taxpayer’s tax refund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.9.

Any tax preparer, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 20645.7, who endorses or otherwise negotiates (directly or through an agent) any warrant made with respect to assistance claimed under this part which is issued to a claimant (other than the tax preparer) shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, together with the costs of prosecution.

This section shall not apply where the tax preparer has advanced the taxpayer an amount of money
 equal to or greater than the amount of the taxpayer’s tax refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 700, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

20646.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of any law effecting changes in this part shall be applied with respect to claims filed for property tax assistance for fiscal years beginning after enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.6. COUNTY DEFERRED PROPERTY TAX PROGRAM FOR SENIOR CITIZENS AND DISABLED CITIZENS [20800. - 20825.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [20800. - 20808.]

20800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the County Deferred Property Tax Program for Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20801.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20802.

(a) “Claimant” means an owner of a residential dwelling, as defined in Section 20808, who applies to a participating county for deferment of property taxes pursuant to this chapter and meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has an annual household income, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 20803, that does not exceed thirty-five thousand five hundred dollars ($35,500).

(2) (A) Has attained eligibility for full social security benefits as of the last day of the filing period for that fiscal year, or (B) is blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except in the case of retroactive deferment, as provided for in Section 20810, in which the age eligibility shall be 62 years old.

(3) Has equity value of at least 20 percent. For purposes of this subdivision, “equity value” means the amount by which the fair market value of the residential dwelling exceeds the total amount of any liens or other obligations against the residential dwelling. A participating county may require a claimant to provide an appraisal by a licensed or certified appraiser in support of his or her application. If an alternate appraisal method is used, a claimant whose application is denied for insufficient equity, may
 provide an appraisal by a licensed or certified appraiser in support of his or her application for consideration by the county.

(b) Only one claimant per residential dwelling may have property taxes deferred under this chapter at any one time.

(c) A claimant shall apply to participate in the program in each year that he or she seeks to defer property taxes under the program.

(d) The county treasurer, or county tax collector, may require a claimant to furnish evidence of the claimant’s ongoing eligibility in order to continue participation in the program in a subsequent year.

(e) If the claimant fails or refuses to furnish any information requested in writing by the county pursuant to this chapter, or files a fraudulent claim for deferment under this
 chapter, the claimant’s application to defer property taxes under this chapter shall be null and void, any record of a deferment payment on the tax roll shall be canceled, the tax or assessment shall be a lien as though no payment had been made, and the amount of the lien shall be increased by any penalties or interest resultant from property tax delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20803.

(a) “Household income” means all income, as defined in subdivision (b), received by any member of a household while that member is or was a member of that household.

(b) “Income” means adjusted gross income, as defined in Section 17072, plus all of the following cash items:

(1) Amounts contributed on behalf of the contributor to a
 tax-sheltered retirement plan or deferred compensation plan.

(2) Annual winnings from the California Lottery in excess of six hundred dollars ($600) in the current calendar year.

(3) Exempt interest received from any source.

(4) Gifts and inheritances in excess of three hundred dollars ($300), other than transfers between members of the household. Gifts and inheritances shall include noncash items.

(5) Life insurance proceeds to the extent that the proceeds exceed the expenses incurred for the last illness and funeral of the deceased spouse of the claimant. “Expenses incurred for the last illness” shall include unreimbursed expenses paid or incurred during the income calendar year and any expenses paid or incurred thereafter up until the day the claim
 is filed. For purposes of this paragraph, funeral expenses shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(6) Nontaxable amount of any pensions and annuities.

(7) Nontaxable gain from the sale of a residence, as defined in Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) Nontaxable military compensation as defined in Section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(9) Nontaxable scholarship and fellowship grants as defined in Section 117 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(10) Public assistance and relief.

(11) Railroad retirement benefits.

(12) Sick leave payments.

(13) Social Security benefits (not including Medicare benefits).

(14) Temporary workers’ compensation payments.

(15) Unemployment insurance payments.

(16) Veterans’ benefits.

(17) If an alternative minimum tax is required to be paid pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 17062) of Part 10, the amount of the alternative minimum taxable income, regardless of whether or not that amount is held in cash, in excess of the regular taxable income otherwise applicable.

(c) Net business loss, net rental loss, net capital loss, or other net losses, amounts deducted for depreciation, or other noncash expenses shall not be deducted
 in calculating adjusted gross income for purposes of this section.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, income shall be determined for the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal year for which deferment is claimed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20804.

(a) “Owner of a residential dwelling” includes all of the following:

(1) An individual with an ownership interest of a vendee, who is in possession of the residential dwelling under a land sale contract, provided that the contract or memorandum thereof is recorded, and only from the date of recordation of the contract or memorandum thereof in the office of the county recorder of a participating county
 in which the residential dwelling is located.

(2) An individual with an ownership interest of a holder of a life estate in the residential dwelling, provided that the instrument creating the life estate is recorded, and only from the date of recordation of that instrument in the office of the county recorder of a participating county in which the residential dwelling is located.

(3) If the residential dwelling is located within a participating county, an individual with a joint-tenant or tenant-in-common ownership interest in the residential dwelling, or the interest of a tenant where title is held in tenancy by the entirety or as community property.

(4) An individual with an ownership interest in the residential dwelling and the title to the residential dwelling, located within a participating county, is held in
 trust.

(5) For purposes of this chapter, an individual who is the registered owner of a mobilehome attached to a permanent foundation and assessed as real property.

(b) An ownership interest described in subdivision (a) shall be required to be evidenced by a duly recorded instrument in the office of the county recorder of a participating county in which the residential dwelling is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20805.

“Participating county” means a county that makes an election described in Section 20810.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20806.

“Program” means the County Deferred Property Tax Program for Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20807.

“Property taxes” means ad valorem property taxes or special assessments imposed upon a residential dwelling within the year in which deferment is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20808.

(a) (1) “Residential dwelling” means a dwelling, and the land surrounding that dwelling as is reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling as a home, occupied by the claimant as his or her principal place of residence, and owned by any of the following:

(A) The claimant.

(B) The claimant and the claimant’s
 spouse.

(C) The claimant and his or her parents, children (whether natural or adopted), or grandchildren of either the claimant or the claimant’s spouse.

(D) The claimant and the spouse of any parent, child (whether natural or adopted), or grandchild of either the claimant or the claimant’s spouse.

(E) The claimant and another individual who resides in this state and is eligible for deferment under this chapter.

(2) “Residential dwelling” shall also include all of the following:

(A) A condominium that is assessed as real property for local property tax purposes.

(B) A portion of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and
 the portion of land upon which it is built.

(C) A mobilehome that is permanently attached to a permanent foundation and assessed as real property for local property tax purposes.

(b) “Residential dwelling” shall not include any of the following:

(1) Any dwelling in which the claimant does not have an equity value of 20 percent, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 20802.

(2) Any dwelling in which the claimant’s interest is a life estate or is held pursuant to a contract of sale, unless the claimant obtains the written consent of the holder of the reversionary interest subject to the life estate, or the vendor under the contract of sale, for the claimant to participate in the program with respect to the dwelling.

(3) Any dwelling for which the claimant does not receive a secured tax bill.

(4) Any dwelling in which the claimant’s interest is held as a possessory interest, except a life estate as described in paragraph (2).

(5) Any houseboat or floating home.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Deferment [20810. - 20817.]

20810.

A county may elect to participate in the County Deferred Property Tax Program for Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens by adopting a resolution indicating the county’s intention to participate in and to administer the program. All requirements of a county or county officials set forth in this chapter are conditioned upon the county’s adoption of this resolution. Under this program, a participating county may defer a claimant’s property taxes retroactively, for property taxes due on or
 before February 20, 2011, and prospectively, as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20811.

(a) A claimant shall use the application form of a county to initiate participation in the program pursuant to Section 20810.

(b) Upon a participating county’s receipt of a claim for property tax deferment under the program, submitted within the filing period specified in Section 20812, the county treasurer or county tax collector shall review the claimant’s application for program eligibility,
 consistent with the requirements specified in Section 20802.

(c) If the claimant is eligible to participate in the program, and if there are sufficient funds within the county’s Property Tax Deferral Fund, established pursuant to Section 20822, to defer property taxes on the claimant’s residential dwelling for that fiscal year, the county treasurer or county tax collector, may do all of the following:

(1) Defer the property taxes due on the claimant’s residential dwelling and owing for that fiscal year.

(2) Issue a subvention payment, equivalent to the amount of the deferred property taxes, from the county’s Property Tax Deferral Fund to the county to be processed in the same manner as all other property tax payments.

(3) Direct the county auditor to
 apportion that subvention payment in the same manner as if the property taxes had been paid.

(4) Provide a letter or other written confirmation to the claimant, noting the relevant fiscal year of participation, for use as written confirmation of program participation.

(d) If the claimant’s property taxes are deferred under the program, the participating county shall not charge the claimant any penalties, or undertake any collections actions with respect to taxes deferred under this chapter.

(e) (1) The amount of property taxes deferred, plus any interest accrued thereon, shall be secured by a judgment lien, against the claimant’s residential dwelling for which the property taxes are deferred.

(2) In the case of a residential
 dwelling that is part of a larger parcel taxed as a unit, including, but not limited to, a duplex, farm, or multidwelling or multipurpose building, the lien shall be against the entire tax parcel.

(f) The lien shall be evidenced by a notice of lien for deferred property taxes executed by the county, and shall secure all sums deferred and owing under this chapter, including amounts deferred subsequent to the initial deferment. The notice of lien shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The names of all record owners of the real property for which the county has deferred property taxes under the program.

(2) A description of the real property for which property taxes have been deferred.

(g) The county recorder shall index the lien
 according to the names of each record owner and the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20812.

(a) The filing period for a claimant to apply to a participating county for deferment under the program shall be from October 1 to December 10 of each year.

(b) A participating county may require any information necessary to process the claimant’s application for deferment under the program, whether through the county’s application form or forms or otherwise.

(c) Any form filed by a claimant under this chapter shall not be under oath, but shall contain, or be verified by, a written declaration that the information therein was provided under the penalty of perjury.

(d) All forms supplied to the claimant shall include a statement of the interest rate that will apply to the property taxes deferred under the program.

(e) A county may grant a reasonable extension for filing a claim if it determines that good cause for the extension exists. However, no extension shall be granted beyond the termination of the fiscal year for which deferment is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20813.

(a) Upon receipt of a notice of lien for deferred property taxes from the county treasurer, the county assessor, or county tax collector shall immediately do all of the following:

(1) Enter on the notice of lien a description of the real property for which the taxes have been deferred.

(2) Enter on the notice of lien the names of all
 record owners of the real property, as disclosed by the county assessor’s records.

(3) Enter on the assessment records applicable to the property, the fact that the taxes on the property have been deferred.

(b) Upon entry of the information required by subdivision (a), the county assessor shall immediately forward the notice of lien to the county recorder, who shall record the notice of lien.

(c) When the record reveals a change in the ownership status of the real property subsequent to the date of entry of the deferral information thereon, the county assessor shall notify the county treasurer or county tax collector, as appropriate, of the change in the ownership status in the manner prescribed by the county treasurer or county tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20814.

(a) A participating county shall reduce the amount secured by the lien provided for in subdivision (e) of Section 20811 by the amount of any payment received for that purpose. Payments shall be applied to the oldest deferral amount in order of lien recordation date until paid in full.

(b) A participating county shall increase the amount secured by that lien to reflect the accrual of interest on the
 property taxes deferred, or any subsequent deferral of property taxes made with respect to that residential dwelling pursuant to a claim of that claimant.

(c) A participating county shall annually adjust the lien as described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20815.

If at any time the amount of the obligation secured by the lien for deferred property taxes is paid in full or is otherwise discharged, the county treasurer or county tax collector shall do all of the following:

(a) Execute and cause to be recorded by the county recorder a release of the associated lien conclusively evidencing the satisfaction of all amounts secured by the lien. The cost of recording the release of the
 lien shall be added to, and become part of the obligation secured by, the lien being released.

(b) Direct the county tax collector, or other appropriate county official, to remove from the secured roll the information required to be entered thereon by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2514 with respect to the real property described in the lien.

(c) Direct the county tax collector, or other appropriate county official, to remove the information required to be entered into the county assessment records by Section 2515 from the assessment records applicable to the real property described in the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20816.

(a) If property taxes are deferred for a claimant and that claimant subsequently dies, all amounts owed by that claimant pursuant to this chapter shall become due as of the end of the next application period, unless another eligible claimant for the same residential dwelling successfully applies to the county for deferment pursuant to this chapter for the next fiscal year.

(b) All amounts owed by the
 claimant pursuant to this chapter shall become due immediately if any of the following occurs: 

(1) The claimant ceases to own the residential dwelling by sale, conveyance, or condemnation.

(2) The claimant ceases to reside permanently at the residential dwelling.

(3) The claimant’s equity in the residential dwelling falls below the amount necessary to be eligible to participate in the program, as provided by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 20802 and subdivision (b) of Section 20808.

(4) The claimant refinances an existing mortgage or deed of trust on the residential dwelling causing his or her equity value in the residential dwelling to decline by 5 percent or more.

(5) Deferment was granted erroneously because eligibility requirements were not actually met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20817.

(a) The county treasurer or county tax collector shall maintain a record of all residential dwellings against which a notice of lien for deferred property taxes has been recorded pursuant to this chapter. With respect to each residential dwelling, the record shall include, but not be limited to, the name of the claimant, a description of the real property against which the lien is recorded, the identification number of the notice of lien or book and page number of
 the recording, and the amount of the lien.

(b) Information and records of the program not required to be disclosed shall be maintained in the same manner as described in Section 408.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Financing [20820. - 20825.]

20820.

A participating county may charge an application fee from a claimant upon that claimant’s submission of an application form to participate in the program, consistent with Section 54985 of the Government Code. The application fees derived from all claimants in a participating county shall be used to offset that county’s costs incurred in administering the program. The proceeds of the fee shall be deposited in an account within the Property Tax Deferral Fund, established by Section 20822,
 to be used exclusively to pay those administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20821.

(a) A participating county shall charge claimants interest on the amount of property taxes deferred pursuant to this part. The effective annual interest rate shall be 7 percent, or the effective annual yield earned in the prior fiscal year by the Pooled Money Investment Account plus 2 percent, whichever is higher, rounded to the nearest full percent.

(b) The interest rate provided for by subdivision
 (a) shall be applied as of the first day of the month in which a deferment payment is made pursuant to this chapter and every day of the month thereafter until the lien is discharged. In the event that any payment is applied, in any month, to reduce the amount owed under the lien, the interest rate shall be applied to the balance of the amount owed beginning on the first day of the following month.

(c) In computing interest in accordance with this section, fractions of a cent shall be disregarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20822.

Each participating county shall establish a Property Tax Deferral Fund within its treasury. Expenditures from this fund shall be for the sole purposes of making property tax deferment subvention payments pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 20811 and offsetting the county’s administrative costs, as described in Section 20820.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20823.

(a) The deferment of property taxes pursuant to this chapter shall not affect the obligation of a borrower to continue to make payments to a lender with respect to an impound account, trust, or other type of account described in Section 2954 of the Civil Code which was established prior to the effective date of the act that added this section.

(b) (1) No lender shall require a
 borrower to maintain an impound, trust, or other similar type of account with regard to property taxes once the borrower has deferred these taxes pursuant to this chapter and submits to the lender evidence of tax deferment under this part, except in the following circumstances:

(A) Federal law, regulation, rule, or program requires the borrower to maintain an impound, trust, or other similar type of account with regard to property taxes.

(B) The borrower is required to make payments to a lender using the type of account described in Section 2954 of the Civil Code for a loan that is made, guaranteed, or insured by a federal government lending or insuring agency.

(C) The prohibition would impair the express obligations of a loan agreement.

(2) If not
 previously used in payment or partial payment of property taxes, any payment made by a borrower to an impound, trust, or other similar type of account prior to the time of submission of evidence of tax deferment pursuant to this part shall be refunded to the borrower within 30 days thereafter.

(c) No lender or other person authorized to take sale on real property shall file a notice of default based solely on a borrower’s failure to pay property taxes if the borrower provides evidence of participation in the property tax deferment program established pursuant to this part. A borrower who is a claimant shall provide evidence of participation to each lender upon a participating county’s approval of the claimant’s application to participate in the program.

(d) A letter or other written confirmation from the county identifying an individual as a participant in the program, provided
 pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 20811, shall be considered as evidence of participation for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20824.

If the deferment claim is filed timely, then any delinquent penalties and interest for that fiscal year shall be canceled unless the failure to perfect the claim was due to willful neglect on the part of the claimant or his or her representative. In the event of such willful neglect, any property tax deferment subvention payment may be used only if it is accompanied by sufficient amounts to pay the delinquent interest and penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20825.

If a property tax deferment repayment is made to satisfy an obligation secured by a lien for property tax deferment, and the repayment exceeds the amount owed to the participating county under the lien, the county shall refund the overpayment to the party entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (AB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.7. TAXPAYERS' BILL OF RIGHTS [21001. - 21028.]

21001.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Katz-Harris Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

The Legislature finds and declares that taxes are the most sensitive point of contact between citizens and their government, and that there is a delicate balance between revenue collection and freedom from government oppression. It is the intent of the Legislature to place guarantees in California law to ensure that the rights, privacy, and property of California taxpayers are adequately protected during the process of the assessment and collection of taxes.

The Legislature further finds that the California tax system is
 based largely on self-assessment, and the development of understandable tax laws and taxpayers informed of those laws will improve both self-assessment and the relationship between taxpayers and government. It is the further intent of the Legislature to promote improved taxpayer self-assessment by improving the clarity of tax laws and efforts to inform the public of the proper application of those laws.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the purpose of any tax proceeding between the Franchise Tax Board and a taxpayer is the determination of the taxpayer’s correct tax liability. It is the intent of the Legislature that, in the furtherance of this purpose, the Franchise Tax Board may inquire into, and shall allow the taxpayer every opportunity to present, all relevant information pertaining to the taxpayer’s liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

The Franchise Tax Board shall administer this part. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this part shall apply to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

For purposes of this part, “board” means the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.1.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the terms “Internal Revenue Code,” “Internal Revenue Code of 1954,” or “Internal Revenue Code of 1986,” for purposes of this part, mean Title 26 of the United States Code, including all amendments thereto, as enacted on the specified date for the applicable taxable year as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 75.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.5.

For the purposes of this part, except as otherwise provided, the determination of whether an individual is an employee shall be governed by Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2775) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 5.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21004.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for coordinating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees. The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(b) The advocate or his or her designee shall give highest priority to reviewing and taking prompt and appropriate action, including staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of board action. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest which would otherwise accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2016, the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, in coordination with the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board, shall provide relief pursuant to this subdivision and abate any penalties, fees, additions to tax, or interest assessed if it is determined that the penalties, fees, additions to tax, or interest that have been assessed, or any part thereof, is attributable to any of the following:

(A) Erroneous action or erroneous inaction by the board in processing documents filed or payments made by taxpayers.

(B) Unreasonable delay caused by the board.

(C) Erroneous written advice that does not qualify for relief under Section 21012.

(2) Relief shall be granted pursuant to this subdivision only if no significant aspect of that error or delay can be attributed to the taxpayer involved and relief is not available under any other provision of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), including any relief granted under any regulation or other administrative pronouncement of the board.

(3) (A) (i) Any relief granted pursuant to this subdivision in which the total reduction in penalties, fees, additions to tax, or interest exceeds five hundred dollars ($500) shall be submitted to the executive officer for concurrence.

(ii) The total relief granted pursuant to this subdivision to a taxpayer with respect to penalties, fees, additions to tax, or interest for a taxable year may not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(iii) Beginning on January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the amount specified in clause (ii) shall be recomputed in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 19442, modified by substituting “January 1, 2017” for “January 1, 2004.”

(B) Whenever relief is granted under this subdivision, the
 board itself shall be notified and there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the executive officer of the board a public record with respect to that relief. The public record shall include the following:

(i) The taxpayer’s name.

(ii) The total amount involved.

(iii) The amount payable or refundable due to the error or delay.

(iv) A summary of why the relief is warranted.

(4) A refund may be paid as a result of relief granted under this subdivision only if the applicable statute of limitations, with respect to filing a claim for refund, remains open as of the date that the basis for providing relief, as authorized in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of
 paragraph (1), as determined by the board.

(d) No other entity may participate in the grant or denial of relief pursuant to this section. 

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, all determinations made under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall not be subject to review in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(f) (1) The amendments made by Section 1 of Chapter 349 of the Statutes of 2012 shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(2) The amendments made by the act adding this paragraph shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 349, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 540)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21005.

(a) The board, in consultation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, shall develop and implement a taxpayer education and information program directed at, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Taxpayer or industry groups identified in the annual report described in Section 21006.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(3) (A) Identifying forms, procedures, regulations, or laws which are confusing and lead to taxpayer
 errors.

(B) Taking appropriate action, including recommending remedial legislation to change those items identified pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following: 

(1) Communication with the taxpayer groups specified in Section 21006 which explains in simplified terms the most common errors made by the taxpayers or industry group and how those errors may be avoided or corrected.

(2) Participating in small business seminars and similar programs organized by state and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board to explain in simplified terms the most common errors made by taxpayers
 and how those errors may be avoided or corrected.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and to minimize recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21006.

(a) The board shall perform annually a systematic identification of areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance and shall report its findings to the Legislature by January 15 of each year.

(b) As part of the identification process described in subdivision (a), the board shall do both of the following:

(1) Compile and analyze sample data from its audit process, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The statute or regulation violated by the taxpayer.

(B) The amount of tax involved.

(C) The industry or business engaged in by the taxpayer.

(D) The number of years covered in the audit period.

(E) Whether professional tax preparation assistance was utilized by the taxpayer.

(F) Whether income tax or bank and corporation tax returns were filed by the taxpayer.

(2) Conduct an annual hearing before the board itself where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Personal Income Tax Law or the
 Corporation Tax Law which may further facilitate achievement of the legislative findings.

(c) The board shall include in its report recommendations for improving taxpayer compliance and uniform administration, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Changes in statute or board regulations.

(2) Improvement of training of board personnel.

(3) Improvement of taxpayer communication and education.

(4) Increased enforcement capabilities.

(d) The board shall include in its report a summary of cases where relief was granted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21004, including the nature of the error or delay, and
 the steps taken by the board to remedy systemic issues that caused the error or delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 66, Sec. 2.   (AB 1582)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21007.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language which explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, these statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include an appropriate statement in the tax booklets which are mailed annually to individuals and corporations. The board also shall
 include an appropriate statement in the tax booklets informing taxpayers they may be requested by the board to furnish a copy of California or federal tax returns that are the subject of or related to a federal audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 414, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

21008.

(a) The amount of revenue collected or assessed by the board shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals.

(b) The board shall annually certify by letter to the Legislature that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21009.
